ru: Тип комплекта проводов зажигания: Провод катушки + комплект проводов; Только провод катушки; Полный комплект (на двигатель); Одиночный провод; Другое
zh-CN: 点火高压线套装类型: 线圈线 + 点火线组; 仅线圈线; 全套 (发动机); 单点火线; 其他
zh-TW: 點火線組類型: 線圈導線 + 導線組; 僅線圈導線; 全套 (引擎); 單一導線; 其他
pl: Typ zestawu przewodów zapłonowych: Kabel cewki + zestaw przewodów; Tylko przewód cewki; Kompletny zestaw (silnik); Pojedynczy przewód; Inne
fi: Sytytysjohtosarjan tyyppi: Puolan johto ja sytytysjohtosarja; Vain puolan johto; Täysi sarja (moottori); Yksittäinen johto; Muu
hu: Gyújtáskábel készlet típusa: Trafókábel és gyújtókábel készlet; Csak trafókábel; Teljes készlet (motor); Egyetlen gyújtókábel; Egyéb
ko: 점화 리드 세트 유형: 코일 와이어 및 리드 세트; 코일 와이어 전용; 전체 세트(엔진); 싱글 리드; 기타
ro-RO: Tip set de potențial cablului de aprindere: Set cablu bobină + fișe; Doar cablu bobină; Set complet (motor); Fișă individuală; Altele
it: Tipo di set di cavi di accensione: Set cavo bobina e cavi candele; Solo cavo bobina; Set completo (motore); Cavo singolo; Altro
sk-SK: Typ súpravy zapaľovacích káblov: Kábel cievky + súprava káblov; Iba kábel cievky; Kompletná súprava (motor); Jeden kábel; Iné
lt-LT: Uždegimo laidų rinkinio tipas: Ritės laidas + laidų rinkinys; Tik ritės laidas; Pilnas rinkinys (varikliui); Vienas laidas; Kita
en: Ignition lead set type: Coil wire + leads set; Coil wire only; Full set (engine); Single lead; Other
el: Τύπος σετ καλωδίων ανάφλεξης: Μπουζοκαλώδιο πολλαπλασιαστή + σετ καλωδίων; Μπουζοκαλώδιο πολλαπλασιαστή μόνο; Πλήρες σετ (κινητήρας); Μονό καλώδιο; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de conjunto de potencial de oportunidade de ignição: Fio de bobina + conjunto de cabos; Apenas fio de bobina; Conjunto completo (motor); Cabo único; Outro
nb: Type tenningskabelsett: Coilkabel + kabelsett; Kun coilkabel; Komplett sett (motor); Enkeltkabel; Annet
nl: Ontstekingskabel set type: Bobinekabel + bougiekabelset; Alleen bobinekabel; Volledige set (motor); Enkele bougiekabel; Overig
vi: Loại bộ dây dẫn đánh lửa: Bộ dây điện bô bin + dây cao áp; Chỉ dây điện bô bin; Nguyên bộ (động cơ); Dây đơn; Khác
da: Type af tændkabelsæt: Tændspolekabel og tændkabelsæt; Kun tændspolekabel; Komplet sæt (motor); Enkeltkabel; Andet
hr-HR: Ignition potencijalni kupac set type: Žica bobine + set kablova; Samo žica bobine; Puni set (motor); Pojedinačni kabel; Ostalo
th: ชุดสายไฟจุดระเบิด: สายคอยล์ + ชุดสายหัวเทียน; สายคอยล์เท่านั้น; ชุดเต็ม (เครื่องยนต์); สายเดี่ยว; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta kompleta vžigalnih kablov: Kabel tuljave + komplet kablov; Samo kabel tuljave; Celoten komplet (motor); Enojni kabel; Drugo
fr: Type de fil d’allumage: Câble de bobine + jeu de câbles; Câble de bobine uniquement; Jeu complet (moteur); Câble simple; Autre
bg-BG: Тип комплект запалителни кабели: Кабел за бобина и комплект кабели; Само кабел за бобина; Пълен комплект (двигател); Единичен кабел; Други
sv: Typ av tändkabelset: Set med tändkabel + ledningar; Endast tändkabel; Komplett set (motor); Enkel ledning; Övrigt
tr: Ateşleme kablosu seti türü: Bobin teli + buji kablosu seti; Sadece bobin kablosu; Tam set (motor); Tekli kablo; Diğer
cs: Typ sady zapalovacích kabelů: Sada kabelu k cívce a zapalovacích kabelů; Pouze kabel k cívce; Kompletní sada (motor); Samostatný kabel; Ostatní
ja: 点火リードセットタイプ: コイルワイヤー + リードセット; コイルワイヤーのみ; フルセット (エンジン); シングルリード; その他
de: Typ des Zündkabelsatzes: Zündkabel-Set (inklusive Zündspulenkabel); Nur Zündspulenkabel; Komplettsatz (Motor); Einzelkabel; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Cabo de vela tipo de conjunto: Fio de bobina e conjunto de cabos; Apenas fio de bobina; Conjunto completo (motor); Cabo único; Outro
es: Tipo de conjunto de cables de encendido: Cable de bobina y juego de cables; Solo cable de bobina; Juego completo (motor); Cable único; Otro